Florida, session 2026, SB542.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 54 55 Section 1.âThis act shall be known as the âFlorida 56 Naturopathy Sunrise Act.â 57 Section 2.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that naturopathy is a 58 distinct healing art emphasizing natural methods of health care. 59 (2)âThe Legislature further finds that public health and 60 safety require updated, modernized licensing, scope of practice 61 standards, and regulatory oversight for naturopaths. 62 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to reestablish 63 licensure for naturopaths to ensure professional competency, 64 protect the public health, and provide residents of this state 65 with access to regulated naturopathic care. 66 Section 3.âSection 462.01, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 67 as section 462.001, Florida Statutes, and reenacted, reordered, 68 and amended, to read: 69 462.001 462.01âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the 70 term: 71 (1)ââBoardâ means the Board of Naturopathy. 72 (3)ââNatureopathyâ and ânaturopathyâ shall be construed as 73 synonymous terms and mean the use and practice of biofeedback; 74 biochemistry; Christian Science or prayer treatments; 75 counseling; diagnostic procedures, including physical 76 examinations for diagnostic purposes, clinical laboratory tests, 77 if conducted in cooperation with a licensed physician, and 78 physiological function tests; dietary therapy; dietary 79 recommendations; digestive aids; Eastern medicine; Eastern 80 medicine dietary recommendations; enzymes; external 81 applications; first aid; food; food extracts; health coaching; 82 health education; herbal substances, excluding CBD and THC 83 compounds; homeopathy; hygiene; hydrotherapy; hypnotherapy, if 84 licensed as a hypnotherapist or certified in hypnotherapy; 85 indigenous medicine; iridology; ordering an ultrasound, X-ray, 86 or electrocardiogram test, only if working with a licensed 87 physician and referring the client to an appropriate licensed 88 health care professional for conducting and interpreting the 89 tests; mechanotherapy or stretch therapy; minerals; naturopathic 90 light touch therapy; naturopathic testing, such as tongue and 91 nail observational testing; nutrition counseling; nutrition 92 education; nutritional substances, such as amino acids, vitamins 93 and minerals, and nutritional IV therapies, only if ordered in 94 cooperation with a licensed physician; phytotherapy; plant 95 substances; sanitation; spiritual healing; and animal 96 organotherapy not scheduled under chapter 893 psychological, 97 mechanical, and material health sciences to aid in purifying, 98 cleansing, and normalizing human tissues for the preservation or 99 restoration of health, according to the fundamental principles 100 of anatomy, physiology, and applied psychology, as may be 101 required. Naturopathic practice employs, among other agencies, 102 phytotherapy, dietetics, psychotherapy, suggestotherapy, 103 hydrotherapy, zone therapy, biochemistry, external applications, 104 electrotherapy, mechanotherapy, mechanical and electrical 105 appliances, hygiene, first aid, sanitation, and heliotherapy; 106 provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be held or 107 construed to authorize any naturopathic physician licensed 108 hereunder to practice materia medica or surgery or chiropractic 109 medicine, nor shall the provisions of this law in any manner 110 apply to or affect the practice of osteopathic medicine, 111 chiropractic medicine, Christian Science, or any other treatment 112 authorized and provided for by law for the cure or prevention of 113 disease and ailments. 114 (2)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Health. 115 Section 4.âSection 462.023, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 116 Section 5.âSection 462.002, Florida Statutes, is created to 117 read: 118 462.002âBoard of Naturopathy.â 119 (1)âThere is created within the department the Board of 120 Naturopathy. 121 (2)âThe board shall be composed of seven members appointed 122 by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. Four members must 123 be naturopaths licensed under this chapter; one member must be a 124 physician licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459; one member 125 must be a chiropractic physician licensed under chapter 460; and 126 one member must be a pharmacist licensed under chapter 465. 127 (3)âMembers shall serve 4-year terms. Members may serve for 128 no more than 8 consecutive years and no more than 12 years in 129 total. After serving 8 consecutive years, a member is eligible 130 for reappointment for one additional 4-year term after 1 131 calendar year has passed since the date of the end of the last 132 term served. 133 (4)âAs the terms of the members expire, the Governor shall 134 appoint successors for terms of 4 years, and such members shall 135 serve until their successors are appointed. 136 (5)âAll applicable provisions of chapter 456 relating to 137 activities of regulatory boards shall apply. 138 Section 6.âThe first naturopath members appointed to the 139 Board of Naturopathy under s. 462.002, Florida Statutes, as 140 created by this act, must meet all qualifications to obtain a 141 license pursuant to s. 462.004, Florida Statutes. 142 Section 7.âSection 462.003, Florida Statutes, is created to 143 read: 144 462.003âRulemaking authority.âThe board has authority to 145 adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to implement 146 the provisions of this chapter conferring duties upon it. Such 147 rules include, but are not limited to, rules relating to 148 licensure requirements, standards of practice, and continuing 149 education. 150 Section 8.âSection 462.004, Florida Statutes, is created to 151 read: 152 462.004âLicensure requirements; licensure by endorsement.â 153 (1)âAny person desiring to be a licensed naturopath under 154 this chapter must apply to the department, submit to background 155 screening in accordance with s. 456.0135, and submit proof to 156 the department that she or he meets all of the following 157 criteria: 158 (a)âIs at least 21 years of age. 159 (b)âHas obtained professional liability insurance. 160 (c)âHas obtained first aid and cardiopulmonary 161 resuscitation certifications. 162 (d)âHolds one or more of the following qualifications: 163 1.âBoard certification in naturopathy from the American 164 Naturopathic Medical Certification Board. 165 2.âSuccessful passage of the Naturopathic Doctors Licensing 166 Exam from the National Board of Naturopathic Examiners. 167 3.âSuccessful passage of the Naturopathic Physicians 168 Licensing Examinations from the North American Board of 169 Naturopathic Examiners. 170 (2)âThe department shall issue a license by endorsement to 171 any applicant who, upon applying to the department, demonstrates 172 that she or he meets the requirements for licensure by 173 endorsement under s. 456.0145. 174 Section 9.âSection 462.08, Florida Statutes, is renumbered 175 as section 462.005, Florida Statutes, and reenacted and amended, 176 to read: 177 462.005 462.08âRenewal of license to practice naturopathy. 178 Each licenseholder shall biennially renew her or his license to 179 practice naturopathy. As a condition for licensure renewal, an 180 applicant must maintain professional liability coverage and 181 certifications in first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation 182 and comply with the continuing education requirements of s. 183 462.18. The department shall renew a license upon receipt of a 184 renewal application and proof of compliance with the 185 requirements of this section The applicant must furnish to the 186 department such evidence as it requires of the applicantâs 187 compliance with s. 462.18, relating to educational requirements. 188 The biennial renewal fee, the amount of which shall be 189 determined by the department but which may not exceed $1,000, 190 must be paid at the time the application for renewal of the 191 license is filed. 192 Section 10.âSection 462.006, Florida Statutes, is created 193 to read: 194 462.006âTitles.â 195 (1)âNaturopaths licensed under this chapter may use any of 196 the following titles or abbreviations: ânaturopath,â 197 âtraditional naturopath,â ânaturopathic practitioner,â âlicensed 198 naturopath,â âL.N.,â or âN.D.â 199 (2)âNaturopaths licensed under this chapter may not use any 200 of the following titles: ânaturopathic medical doctorâ or 201 ânaturopathic physician.â 202 Section 11.âSection 462.007, Florida Statutes, is created 203 to read: 204 462.007âScope of practice; prescriptive authority.â 205 (1)âThis chapter does not authorize a licensed naturopath 206 to engage in or perform any of the following: 207 (a)âAcupuncture. 208 (b)âElectroacupuncture. 209 (c)âEmergency medicine. 210 (d)âEndoscopies. 211 (e)âInjections, including injections with the use of 212 syringes. 213 (f)âLocal anesthesia. 214 (g)âPhysiological function tests requiring infusion, 215 injection, inhalation, or ingestion of medications to perform 216 the test. 217 (h)âPractice or claim to practice medicine, surgery, 218 osteopathy, dentistry, podiatry, optometry, chiropractic 219 medicine, or physical therapy. 220 (i)âSurgery and surgical procedures. 221 (2)âA licensed naturopath may prescribe, dispense, and 222 administer non-legend nutritional products, including, but not 223 limited to, all of the following: 224 (a)âEssential and nonessential amino acids, such as lysine, 225 glutamine, and tryptophan. 226 (b)âElectrolytes and hydration products, such as oral 227 rehydration salts and electrolyte powders. 228 (c)âEnzymes, including digestive enzymes such as amylase, 229 protease, lipase, bromelain, and papain. 230 (d)âFatty acids, such as omega-3s, omega-6s, and medium 231 chain triglycerides. 232 (e)âHerbal and botanical substances, such as echinacea, 233 ginseng, green tea extract, milk thistle, and turmeric. 234 (f)âMinerals, such as calcium, iron, magnesium, potassium, 235 selenium, and zinc. 236 (g)âNutraceuticals and specialty compounds, such as alpha 237 lipoic acid, coenzyme Q10, glucosamine, chondroitin, and L 238 carnitine. 239 (h)âOther non-legend nutritional substances, such as 240 collagen peptides, fiber supplements, and natural antioxidants. 241 (i)âProbiotics and prebiotics, such as bifidobacterium, 242 fructooligosaccharides, inulin, and lactobacillus. 243 (j)âProtein and meal supplements, such as casein, plant 244 based proteins, and whey protein. 245 (k)âVitamins, such as vitamin A, vitamin B-complex, vitamin 246 C, vitamin D, vitamin E, and vitamin K. 247 (3)âThis chapter does not authorize a licensed naturopath 248 to prescribe, dispense, and administer controlled and 249 noncontrolled legend drugs, including, but not limited to, any 250 of the following: 251 (a)âAntibiotics. 252 (b)âAntidiabetics. 253 (c)âAntihypertensives. 254 (d)âAntivirals. 255 (e)âBarrier devices for contraception or abortion. 256 (f)âBiologics. 257 (g)âBotulinum toxin. 258 (h)âCorticosteroids, including inhaled corticosteroids. 259 (i)âHerbal substances containing CBD and THC compounds. 260 (j)âHormonal therapies. 261 (k)âLipid-lowering agents. 262 (l)âLocal anesthesia. 263 (m)âNonopioid pain medications. 264 (n)âOphthalmic or oral inhalation drugs in aqueous format. 265 (o)âProton pump inhibitors. 266 (p)âThyroid hormones. 267 (q)âVaccinations. 268 (r)âAny controlled substance on Schedules IâV of s. 893.03. 269 (s)âAny other controlled substance or legend drug not used 270 for the practice of naturopathy. 271 Section 12.âSection 462.008, Florida Statutes, is created 272 to read: 273 462.008âInfection control.âThe board may adopt rules 274 relating to the prevention of infection, safe disposal of any 275 potentially infectious materials, and other requirements to 276 protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. 277 Section 13.âSection 462.09, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 278 Section 14.âSection 462.11, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 279 and amended to read: 280 462.11âNaturopaths to observe regulations.âNaturopaths 281 licensed under this chapter Doctors of naturopathy shall observe 282 and are be subject to all state, county, and municipal 283 regulations in regard to the control of contagious and 284 infectious diseases, the reporting of births and deaths, and to 285 any and all other matters pertaining to the public health in the 286 same manner as is required of other practitioners of the healing 287 art. 288 Section 15.âSection 462.13, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 289 Section 16.âSection 462.14, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 290 and amended to read: 291 462.14âGrounds for disciplinary action; action by the 292 department.â 293 (1)âThe following acts constitute grounds for denial of a 294 license or disciplinary action, as specified in s. 456.072(2): 295 (a)âAttempting to obtain, obtaining, or renewing a license 296 to practice naturopathy naturopathic medicine by bribery, by 297 fraudulent misrepresentation, or through an error of the 298 department. 299 (b)âHaving a license to practice naturopathy naturopathic 300 medicine revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, 301 including the denial of licensure, by the licensing authority of 302 another state, territory, or country. 303 (c)âBeing convicted or found guilty, regardless of 304 adjudication, of a crime in any jurisdiction which directly 305 relates to the practice of naturopathy naturopathic medicine or 306 to the ability to practice naturopathy naturopathic medicine. 307 Any plea of nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction for 308 purposes of this chapter. 309 (d)âFalse, deceptive, or misleading advertising. 310 (e)âAdvertising, practicing, or attempting to practice 311 under a name other than oneâs own. 312 (f)âFailing to report to the department any person who the 313 licensee knows is in violation of this chapter or of the rules 314 of the department. However, a person who the licensee knows is 315 unable to practice naturopathy naturopathic medicine with 316 reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or 317 use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type 318 of material, or as a result of a mental or physical condition, 319 may be reported to a consultant operating an impaired 320 practitioner program as described in s. 456.076 rather than to 321 the department. 322 (g)âAiding, assisting, procuring, or advising any 323 unlicensed person to practice naturopathy naturopathic medicine 324 contrary to this chapter or to a rule of the department. 325 (h)âFailing to perform any statutory or legal obligation 326 placed upon a licensed naturopath naturopathic physician. 327 (i)âMaking or filing a report that which the licensee knows 328 to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a 329 report or record required by state or federal law, willfully 330 impeding or obstructing such filing or inducing another person 331 to do so. Such reports or records shall include only those which 332 are signed in the capacity as a licensed naturopath naturopathic 333 physician. 334 (j)âPaying or receiving any commission, bonus, kickback, or 335 rebate, or engaging in any split-fee arrangement in any form 336 whatsoever with a physician, organization, agency, or person, 337 either directly or indirectly, for patients referred to 338 providers of health care goods and services, including, but not 339 limited to, hospitals, nursing homes, clinical laboratories, 340 ambulatory surgical centers, or pharmacies. The provisions of 341 This paragraph may shall not be construed to prevent a 342 naturopath naturopathic physician from receiving a fee for 343 professional consultation services. 344 (k)âExercising influence within a patient-naturopath 345 patient-physician relationship for purposes of engaging a 346 patient in sexual activity. A patient is shall be presumed to be 347 incapable of giving free, full, and informed consent to sexual 348 activity with her or his naturopath physician. 349 (l)âMaking deceptive, untrue, or fraudulent representations 350 in the practice of naturopathy naturopathic medicine or 351 employing a trick or scheme in the practice of naturopathy 352 naturopathic medicine when such scheme or trick fails to conform 353 to the generally prevailing standards of treatment in the 354 medical community. 355 (m)âSoliciting patients, either personally or through an 356 agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation, undue influence, 357 or a form of overreaching or vexatious conduct. A âsolicitationâ 358 is any communication which directly or implicitly requests an 359 immediate oral response from the recipient. 360 (n)âFailing to keep written medical records justifying the 361 course of treatment of the patient, including, but not limited 362 to, patient histories, examination results, test results, X 363 rays, and records of the prescribing, dispensing and 364 administering of non-legend drugs. 365 (o)âExercising influence on the patient or client in such a 366 manner as to exploit the patient or client for the financial 367 gain of the licensee or of a third party, which shall include, 368 but not be limited to, the promoting or selling of services, 369 goods, appliances, or non-legend drugs and the promoting or 370 advertising on any prescription form of a community pharmacy 371 unless the form also states âThis prescription may be filled at 372 any pharmacy of your choice.â 373 (p)âPerforming professional services that which have not 374 been duly authorized by the patient or client, or her or his 375 legal representative, except as provided in s. 743.064, s. 376 766.103, or s. 768.13. 377 (q)âPrescribing, dispensing, administering, mixing, or 378 otherwise preparing a non-legend legend drug, including any 379 controlled substance, other than in the course of the 380 naturopathâs naturopathic physicianâs professional practice. For 381 the purposes of this paragraph, it shall be legally presumed 382 that prescribing, dispensing, administering, mixing, or 383 otherwise preparing non-legend legend drugs, including all 384 controlled substances, inappropriately or in excessive or 385 inappropriate quantities is not in the best interest of the 386 patient and is not in the course of the naturopathâs 387 naturopathic physicianâs professional practice, without regard 388 to her or his intent. 389 (r)âPrescribing, dispensing, or administering any medicinal 390 drug appearing on any schedule set forth in chapter 893 by the 391 naturopath naturopathic physician to herself or himself, except 392 one prescribed, dispensed, or administered to the naturopath 393 naturopathic physician by another practitioner authorized to 394 prescribe, dispense, or administer medicinal drugs. 395 (s)âBeing unable to practice naturopathy naturopathic 396 medicine with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason 397 of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or 398 any other type of material or as a result of any mental or 399 physical condition. In enforcing this paragraph, the department 400 shall have, upon probable cause, authority to compel a 401 naturopath naturopathic physician to submit to a mental or 402 physical examination by physicians designated by the department. 403 The failure of a naturopath naturopathic physician to submit to 404 such an examination when so directed shall constitute an 405 admission of the allegations against her or him upon which a 406 default and final order may be entered without the taking of 407 testimony or presentation of evidence, unless the failure was 408 due to circumstances beyond the naturopathâs naturopathic 409 physicianâs control. A naturopath naturopathic physician 410 affected under this paragraph shall at reasonable intervals be 411 afforded an opportunity to demonstrate that she or he can resume 412 the competent practice of naturopathy naturopathic medicine with 413 reasonable skill and safety to patients. In any proceeding under 414 this paragraph, neither the record of proceedings nor the orders 415 entered by the department may be used against a naturopath 416 naturopathic physician in any other proceeding. 417 (t)âGross or repeated malpractice or the failure to 418 practice naturopathy naturopathic medicine with that level of 419 care, skill, and treatment which is recognized by a reasonably 420 prudent similar naturopath physician as being acceptable under 421 similar conditions and circumstances. The department shall give 422 great weight to the provisions of s. 766.102 when enforcing this 423 paragraph. 424 (u)âPerforming any procedure or prescribing any therapy 425 which, by the prevailing standards of medical practice in the 426 community, constitutes experimentation on a human subject, 427 without first obtaining full, informed, and written consent. 428 (v)âPracticing or offering to practice beyond the scope 429 permitted by law or accepting and performing professional 430 responsibilities that which the licensee knows or has reason to 431 know that she or he is not competent to perform. 432 (w)âDelegating professional responsibilities to a person 433 when the licensee delegating such responsibilities knows or has 434 reason to know that such person is not qualified by training, 435 experience, or licensure to perform them. 436 (x)âViolating a lawful order of the department previously 437 entered in a disciplinary hearing or failing to comply with a 438 lawfully issued subpoena of the department. 439 (y)âConspiring with another licensee or with any other 440 person to commit an act, or committing an act, that which would 441 tend to coerce, intimidate, or preclude another licensee from 442 lawfully advertising her or his services. 443 (z)âProcuring, or aiding or abetting in the procuring of, 444 an unlawful termination of pregnancy. 445 (aa)âPresigning blank prescription forms. 446 (bb)âPrescribing by the naturopath naturopathic physician 447 for office use any medicinal drug appearing on Schedule II in 448 chapter 893. 449 (cc)âPrescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering, 450 supplying, selling, or giving any drug that which is an 451 amphetamine or sympathomimetic amine drug, or a compound 452 designated pursuant to chapter 893 as a Schedule II controlled 453 substance to or for any person except for: 454 1.âThe treatment of narcolepsy; hyperkinesis; behavioral 455 syndrome in children characterized by the developmentally 456 inappropriate symptoms of moderate to severe distractability, 457 short attention span, hyperactivity, emotional lability, and 458 impulsivity; or drug-induced brain dysfunction. 459 2.âThe differential diagnostic psychiatric evaluation of 460 depression or the treatment of depression shown to be refractory 461 to other therapeutic modalities. 462 3.âThe clinical investigation of the effects of such drugs 463 or compounds when an investigative protocol therefor is 464 submitted to, reviewed, and approved by the department before 465 such investigation is begun. 466 (dd)âPrescribing, ordering, dispensing, administering, 467 supplying, selling, or giving growth hormones, testosterone or 468 its analogs, human chorionic gonadotropin (HCG), or other 469 hormones for the purpose of muscle building or to enhance 470 athletic performance. For the purposes of this subsection, the 471 term âmuscle buildingâ does not include the treatment of injured 472 muscle. A prescription written for the drug products listed 473 above may be dispensed by the pharmacist with the presumption 474 that the prescription is for legitimate medical use. 475 (ee)âViolating any provision of this chapter or chapter 476 456, or any rules adopted pursuant thereto. 477 (2)âThe board department may enter an order denying 478 licensure or imposing any of the penalties in s. 456.072(2) 479 against any applicant for licensure or licensee who is found 480 guilty of violating any provision of subsection (1) of this 481 section or who is found guilty of violating any provision of s. 482 456.072(1). 483 (3)âThe board department shall not reinstate the license of 484 a naturopath naturopathic physician until such time as the board 485 department is satisfied that such person has complied with all 486 the terms and conditions set forth in the final order and that 487 such person is capable of safely engaging in the practice of 488 naturopathy naturopathic medicine. 489 (4)âThe board department shall by rule establish guidelines 490 for the disposition of disciplinary cases involving specific 491 types of violations. Such guidelines may include minimum and 492 maximum fines, periods of supervision or probation, or 493 conditions of probation or reissuance of a license. 494 Section 17.âSection 462.16, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 495 and amended to read: 496 462.16âReissue of license.âAny person who practices shall 497 practice naturopathy after her or his license has been revoked 498 is and registration annulled shall be deemed to have practiced 499 naturopathy without a license.; provided, However, at any time 500 after 6 months after the date of such revocation said 501 conviction, the department may grant a license to the person 502 affected, restoring to her or him all the rights and privileges 503 of and pertaining to the practice of naturopathy as defined and 504 regulated by this chapter. The fee therefor shall not exceed 505 $250. 506 Section 18.âSection 462.17, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 507 and amended to read: 508 462.17âPenalty for offenses relating to naturopathy.âA 509 person who engages in any of the following acts commits a felony 510 of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 511 775.083, or s. 775.084 Any person who shall: 512 (1)âSells Sell, fraudulently obtains obtain, or furnishes 513 furnish any naturopathic diploma, license, record, or 514 registration or aids aid or abets abet in the same.; 515 (2)âPractices Practice naturopathy under the cover of any 516 diploma, license, record, or registration illegally or 517 fraudulently obtained or secured or issued unlawfully or upon 518 fraudulent representations.; 519 (3)âAdvertises Advertise to practice naturopathy under a 520 name other than her or his own or under an assumed name.; 521 (4)âFalsely impersonates impersonate another practitioner 522 of a like or different name.; 523 (5)âPractices Practice or advertises advertise to practice 524 naturopathy or uses use in connection with her or his name any 525 designation tending to imply or to designate the person as a 526 practitioner of naturopathy without then being lawfully licensed 527 and authorized to practice naturopathy in this state.; or 528 (6)âPractices Practice naturopathy during the time her or 529 his license is suspended or revoked 530 531 shall be guilty of a felony of the third degree, punishable as 532 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 533 Section 19.âSection 462.18, Florida Statutes, is reenacted 534 and amended to read: 535 462.18âContinuing education Educational requirements.â 536 (1)âAt the time each licensee shall renew her or his 537 license as otherwise provided in this chapter, each licensee, in 538 addition to the payment of the regular renewal fee, shall 539 furnish to the board department satisfactory evidence that, in 540 the year preceding each such application for renewal, the 541 licensee has completed 25 hours of continuing education in 542 naturopathy and medical nutrition therapy, and attended the 2 543 day educational program as promulgated and conducted by the 544 Florida Naturopathic Physicians Association, Inc., or an, as a 545 substitute therefor, the equivalent of that program as approved 546 by the board department. The department shall send a written 547 notice to this effect to every person holding a valid license to 548 practice naturopathy within this state at least 30 days before 549 prior to May 1 in each even-numbered year, directed to the last 550 known address of such licensee, and shall enclose with the 551 notice proper blank forms for application for annual license 552 renewal. All of the details and requirements of the aforesaid 553 educational program shall be adopted and prescribed by the 554 department. In the event of national emergencies, or for 555 sufficient reason, the department shall have the power to excuse 556 the naturopaths naturopathic physicians as a group or as 557 individuals from taking this postgraduate course. 558 (2)âThe determination of whether a substitute annual 559 educational program is necessary shall be solely within the 560 discretion of the department. 561 Section 20.âSection 462.19, Florida Statutes, is amended to 562 read: 563 462.19âRenewal of license; Inactive status.â 564 (1)âThe department shall renew a license upon receipt of 565 the renewal application and fee. 566 (2)âA licensee may request that her or his license be 567 placed in an inactive status by making application to the 568 department and paying a fee in an amount set by the department 569 not to exceed $50. 570 Section 21.âSection 462.2001, Florida Statutes, is 571 reenacted to read: 572 462.2001âSaving clause.âAll licenses to practice 573 naturopathy issued pursuant to this chapter and valid on October 574 1, 1985, shall remain in full force and effect. 575 Section 22.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.